Utah statutes.
17-50-330.   Prohibition against spending certain transportation funds.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Apportioned" means divided or assigned among the states based on a prescribed formula established in 23 U.S.C.

(b)  "Authorization act" means an act of Congress enacted after July 1, 2009 that authorizes transportation programs from the Highway Trust Fund established in 26 U.S.C. Sec. 9503.

(2)  A county may not spend project-specific funds that are allocated through an authorization act for a transportation-related project that is eligible for funds apportioned to the state in support of the statewide transportation improvement program unless the specified project is included on the statewide transportation improvement program.



Enacted by Chapter 332, 2009 General Session

